Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2337.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3722(f) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3722. Off-road vehicles in urban municipalities.* * *(f) Construction.--[Nothing] NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6301 (RELATING TO PROSECUTIONS UNDER LOCAL ORDINANCES SUPERSEDED BY TITLE), NOTHING contained in this section shall be construed to:(1) allow the operation of an all-terrain vehicle or dirt bike outside of the boundaries of an urban municipality in a manner that is inconsistent with this title or other law of this Commonwealth[.];(2) prevent an urban municipality from enacting or <--123456789101112131415161718 enforcing an ordinance that PENALIZES, prohibits, permits or regulates the operation of an all-terrain vehicle or dirt bike MORE STRICTLY OR SEVERELY THAN SUBSECTIONS (A), (C) AND (E) inside of the boundaries of the urban municipality; or (3) supersede or preempt an ordinance enacted prior to the effective date of this paragraph by an urban municipality that PENALIZES, prohibits, permits or regulates the operation of an all- terrain vehicle or dirt bike MORE STRICTLY OR SEVERELY THAN SUBSECTIONS (A), (C) AND (E) inside of the boundaries of the urban municipality. * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2337PN3331 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112